test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-51nwswma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - nõsõma: # Verb (51) nõsõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     nõsõma+V+Inf/mA: nõsõma
     nõsõma+V+Inf: nõstaq
     nõsõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: nõsnuq
     nõsõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: nõst
     nõsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nõsõ
     nõsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nõsõs
     nõsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nõssi
     nõsõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: nõssi
